Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.120

Reciprocity.

An applicant for certification or licensure who is currently certified or licensed and in good standing under the laws of another state may obtain a certificate or license as a Washington state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser without being required to satisfy the examination requirements of this chapter if the director determines that: The appraiser licensing and certification program of the other state is in compliance with 12 U.S.C. Secs. 3331-3355, as existed on June 9, 2016, or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section; and the other state's requirements for certification or licensing meet or exceed the licensure standards established in this chapter.

[ 2016 c 144 s 2; 2005 c 339 s 9; 1993 c 30 s 12; 1989 c 414 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.